Hawaii statutes.
D. Alternative Dispute Resolution

§514B-161
Mediation.
(a) If an apartment owner or the board of directors requests
mediation of a dispute involving the interpretation or enforcement of the
association of apartment owners' declaration, bylaws, or house rules, the other
party in the dispute shall be required to participate in mediation. Each
party shall be wholly responsible for its own costs of participating in
mediation, unless both parties agree that one party shall pay all or a
specified portion of the mediation costs. If a party refuses to participate in the mediation of a particular
dispute, a court may take this refusal into consideration when awarding
expenses, costs, and attorneys' fees.

(b) Nothing in subsection (a) shall be
interpreted to mandate the mediation of any dispute involving:

(1) Actions
seeking equitable relief involving threatened property damage or the health or
safety of association members or any other person;

(2) Actions to collect assessments;

(3) Personal injury claims; or

(4) Actions against an association, a board, or one
or more directors, officers, agents, employees, or other persons for amounts in
excess of $2,500 if insurance coverage under a policy of insurance procured by
the association or its board would be unavailable for defense or judgment
because mediation was pursued.

(c) If any mediation under this section is not
completed within two months from commencement, no further mediation shall be
required unless agreed to by the parties. [L 2004, c 164, pt of §2; am L 2007,
c 244, §7; am L 2008, c 205, §§2, 5; am L 2009, c 9, §2; am L 2012, c 34, §14]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next